Hawaii statutes.
§142-3 Department, duties. The
department of agriculture shall have charge, direction, and control of all
matters relating to the inspection of animals and the prevention and
eradication of contagious, infectious, and communicable diseases among animals
and of all matters relating to animal industry within this chapter. [L 1905, c
82, pt of §4; am L 1915, c 136, §8; RL 1925, §609; RL 1935, §204; RL 1945,
§1053; RL 1955, §20-3; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS
§142-3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next